District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.02

Procedure to register order for enforcement.

(a)

A support order or income-withholding order of another state may be registered in the District by sending the following records and information to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia:

(1)

A letter of transmittal to the tribunal requesting registration and enforcement;

(2)

Two copies, including 1 certified copy, of the order to be registered, including any modification of the order;

(3)

A sworn statement by the person requesting registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

(4)

The name of the obligor and, if known:

(A)

The obligor’s address and social security number;

(B)

The name and address of the obligor’s employer and any other source of income of the obligor; and

(C)

A description and the location of property of the obligor in the District not exempt from execution; and

(5)

Except as otherwise provided in § 46-303.12, the name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

(b)

On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form.

(c)

A petition or comparable pleading seeking a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under other law of the District may be filed at the same time as the request for registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for the remedy sought.

(d)

If 2 or more orders are in effect, the person requesting registration shall:

(1)

Furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in effect in addition to the documents specified in this section;

(2)

Specify the order alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and

(3)

Specify the amount of consolidated arrears, if any.

(e)

A request for a determination of which is the controlling order may be filed separately or with a request for registration and enforcement or for registration and modification. The person requesting registration shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 602, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(3), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in the lead-in language to subsec. (a), substituted “records” for “documents”; in par. (a)(2), substituted “the order” for “all orders”, and substituted “the order” for “an order”; in par. (a)(3), substituted “person requesting” for “party seeking”; in par. (a)(5), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in § 46-303.12, the” for “The”, and deleted “agency or” preceding “person”; and added subsecs. (d) and (e).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 602 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).